North Carolina, session 2025, HB127.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 163-82.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-82.5. Distribution of application forms.
The State Board of Elections shall make the forms described in G.S. 163-82.3 available for
distribution through governmental and private entities, with particular emphasis on making them
available for organized voter registration drives.entities."
SECTION 2. Article 7A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 163-82.5A. Sample voter registration drive forms.
(a) The State Board shall develop a sample voter registration form to be used for
organized voter registration drives. The form shall be given an appearance that clearly
distinguishes it from the voter registration application form as described in G.S. 163-82.3. The
form shall include a disclaimer that it is not an official registration application form for voting
purposes. The form may display the contents of what is required on the application form as set
forth in G.S. 163-82.4(a) for informational purposes only and shall not provide spaces for an
individual to fill in the individual's personal information. The form shall include the following
information:
(1) Where to obtain an official voter registration application form.
(2) Where to return completed voter registration application forms in person.
(3) How to register online.
(4) A list of important dates, including the deadline for registering to vote and
dates for any primary or general elections during the election cycle, or how to
find important dates online.
(b) The State Board shall make the sample voter registration forms available to county
boards of elections for distribution in accordance with this section.
(c) An organization seeking to sponsor or conduct a voter registration drive shall register
with the county board of elections in the county in which the voter registration drive is to be held.
In registering with the county board of elections, the organization shall provide the following:
(1) The name of the organization conducting the voter registration drive.
(2) The hierarchical structure within the organization.
*H127-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The number of sample voter registration forms requested.
(4) Whether individuals participating in the voter registration drive are paid
employees or volunteers of the organization.
(5) The duration of the voter registration drive.
(6) The physical location from which the organization will operate the voter
registration drive or whether the drive will be conducted door-to-door, or both.
(d) After an organization has registered with the county board of elections as required by
subsection (c) of this section, the county board of elections shall provide the organization with
the number of sample voter registration forms requested.
(e) No individual or organization shall use the voter registration application form
described in G.S. 163-82.3 for organized voter registration drives. A violation of this section is a
Class 2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to voter
registration drives conducted on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 127-First Edition